Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 56.
CONSTITUTIONAL OFFICERS — GENERAL ASSEMBLY (CONST., ART. 19, § 23
AND AMENDS. 37 AND 48, REPEALED; AND SECTIONS ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. No. 2 (see Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), p. 3033) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on Jan. 28, 1976. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 7, 1976, by a vote of 441,247 for and 236,918 against.

Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 5, repealed Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 23, and Ark. Const. Amends. 37 and 48.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 6: Jan. 1, 1977.

§ 1. Executive department — Composition.

The Executive Department of this State shall consist of a Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, Attorney General, and Commissioner of State Lands, all of whom shall keep their offices at the seat of government, and hold their offices for the term of two (2) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 63, § 1.

§ 2. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning salaries of Executive Department officers, was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 70, § 5.

§ 3. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning salaries of members of the General Assembly, was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 70, § 5.

§ 4. Compensation of municipal officers.

Compensation of municipal officers and officials shall be fixed by the governing body of the municipality, not to exceed limits which may be established by law.